Nevada, session 83, SB237.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Board of Regents shall grant a waiver of the payment
of registration fees, laboratory fees and any other mandatory fees
assessed or incurred by a person who is a surviving spouse or
child of a person killed in the line of duty while on active duty as a
member of the Armed Forces of the United States.
2. The waiver must be granted to a person who enrolls in any
program offered by a school within the System, including, without
limitation, a trade or vocational program, a graduate program or a
professional program.
3. For purposes of assessing fees and charges against a
person to whom a waiver is granted pursuant to this section,
including, without limitation, tuition charges pursuant to NRS
396.540, such a person shall be deemed to be a bona fide resident
of this State.
4. A child may use a waiver granted pursuant to this section
for 10 years after the child attains 18 years of age or, if the child
enrolls in the System before attaining 18 years of age, for 10 years
after the date of such enrollment. A surviving spouse may use a
waiver granted pursuant to this section for 10 years after the date
of the death of the member of the Armed Forces of the United
States.
5. The Board of Regents may request such documentation as
it deems necessary to verify that a person is the surviving spouse
or child of a person killed in the line of duty while on active duty
as a member of the Armed Forces of the United States.
Sec. 1.5. NRS 396.540 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.540 1. For the purposes of this section:
-
*SB237_R1*

– 3 –
(a) “Bona fide resident” shall be construed in accordance with
the provisions of subsections 5 and 6, NRS 10.155 and policies
established by the Board of Regents, to the extent that those policies
do not conflict with any statute. The qualification “bona fide” is
intended to ensure that the residence is genuine and established for
purposes other than the avoidance of tuition.
(b) “Matriculation” has the meaning ascribed to it in regulations
adopted by the Board of Regents.
(c) “Tuition charge” means a charge assessed against students
who are not residents of Nevada and which is in addition to
registration fees or other fees assessed against students who are
residents of Nevada.
2. The Board of Regents may fix a tuition charge for students
at all campuses of the System, but tuition charges must not be
assessed against:
(a) All students whose families have been bona fide residents of
the State of Nevada for at least 12 months before the matriculation
of the student at a university, state college or community college
within the System;
(b) All students whose families reside outside of the State of
Nevada, providing such students have themselves been bona fide
residents of the State of Nevada for at least 12 months before their
matriculation at a university, state college or community college
within the System;
(c) All students whose parent, legal guardian or spouse is a
member of the Armed Forces of the United States who:
(1) Is on active duty and stationed at a military installation in
the State of Nevada or a military installation in another state which
has a specific nexus to this State, including, without limitation, the
Marine Corps Mountain Warfare Training Center located at Pickel
Meadow, California; or
(2) Was on active duty and stationed at a military installation
in the State of Nevada or a military installation in another state
which has a specific nexus to this State, including, without
limitation, the Marine Corps Mountain Warfare Training Center
located at Pickel Meadow, California, on the date on which the
student is admitted to an institution of the System if such students
enroll and maintain continuous enrollment at an institution of the
System;
(d) All students who are using benefits under the Marine
Gunnery Sergeant John David Fry Scholarship pursuant to 38
U.S.C. § 3311(b)(8);
(e) All public school teachers who are employed full-time by
school districts in the State of Nevada;
-
*SB237_R1*

– 4 –
(f) All full-time teachers in private elementary, secondary and
postsecondary educational institutions in the State of Nevada whose
curricula meet the requirements of chapter 394 of NRS;
(g) Employees of the System who take classes other than during
their regular working hours;
(h) Members of the Armed Forces of the United States who are
on active duty and stationed at a military installation in the State of
Nevada or a military installation in another state which has a
specific nexus to this State, including, without limitation, the Marine
Corps Mountain Warfare Training Center located at Pickel Meadow,
California;
(i) Veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States who were
honorably discharged and who were on active duty while stationed
at a military installation in the State of Nevada or a military
installation in another state which has a specific nexus to this State,
including, without limitation, the Marine Corps Mountain Warfare
Training Center located at Pickel Meadow, California, on the date of
discharge;
(j) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, veterans of the
Armed Forces of the United States who were honorably discharged;
(k) Veterans of the Armed Forces of the United States who have
been awarded the Purple Heart;
(l) All students who are:
(1) Veterans using Post-9/11 Educational Assistance
pursuant to 38 U.S.C. §§ 3301 to 3327, inclusive, and became
eligible for such benefits on or after January 1, 2013; or
(2) Spouses or dependents using Post-9/11 Educational
Assistance pursuant to 38 U.S.C. §§ 3301 to 3327, inclusive;
(m) All students who are using Survivors’ and Dependents’
Educational Assistance pursuant to 38 U.S.C. §§ 3500 to 3566,
inclusive;
(n) All students who are a surviving spouse or child of a
person killed in the line of duty while on active duty in the Armed
Forces of the United States;
(o) Students who graduated from a high school located in this
State or who successfully completed the high school equivalency
assessment selected by the State Board pursuant to NRS 390.055 if
the assessment was administered in this State, regardless of whether
the student or the family of the student have been bona fide
residents of the State of Nevada for at least 12 months before the
matriculation of the student at a university, state college or
community college within the System; and
[(o)] (p) All students who have been granted a waiver pursuant
to NRS 396.5449.
-
*SB237_R1*

– 5 –
3. The Board of Regents may grant more favorable exemptions
from tuition charges for veterans of the Armed Forces of the United
States than the exemptions provided pursuant to subsection 2, if
required for the receipt of federal money.
4. The Board of Regents may grant exemptions from tuition
charges each semester to other worthwhile and deserving students
from other states and foreign countries, in a number not to exceed a
number equal to 3 percent of the total matriculated enrollment of
students for the last preceding fall semester.
5. The Board of Regents shall not deny an exemption from
tuition charges provided pursuant to subsection 2 to a student on the
basis that the student is not lawfully present in the United States if
the student has been granted temporary protected status by the
United States Citizenship and Immigration Services of the United
States Department of Homeland Security.
6. The Board of Regents shall not deny an exemption from
tuition charges provided pursuant to:
(a) Paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection 2 to a student on the
basis that the student is not lawfully present in the United States if
the student has received a grant of deferred action from the United
States Department of Homeland Security and:
(1) The provisions of 8 U.S.C. § 1623 are repealed, held to
be invalid or otherwise cease to have effect; or
(2) The Attorney General of this State issues a finding that
such a student would be considered lawfully present in the United
States for the purposes of 8 U.S.C. § 1623.
(b) Paragraphs (c) to [(o),] (p), inclusive, of subsection 2 to a
student on the basis that the student is not lawfully present in the
United States if the student has received a grant of deferred action
from the United States Department of Homeland Security.
Sec. 2. NRS 396.545 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.545 1. To the extent of money available for this purpose,
the Board of Regents shall pay all registration fees, laboratory fees
and expenses for required textbooks and course materials assessed
against or incurred by a surviving spouse or dependent child of a
public safety officer who was killed in the line of duty or any other
public employee who was killed in the performance of his or her
duties, for classes taken towards satisfying the requirements of an
undergraduate degree at a school within the System. No such
payment may be made for any fee assessed against a child after the
child reaches the age of 23 years [.] or for any fee assessed against
a surviving spouse 10 years after the date of the death of the
public safety officer or public employee.
2. There is hereby created in the State General Fund a Trust
Account for the Education of Dependent Children. The Board of
-
*SB237_R1*

– 6 –
Regents shall administer the Account. The Board of Regents may
accept gifts and grants for deposit in the Account. All money held
by the State Treasurer or received by the Board of Regents for that
purpose must be deposited in the Account. The money in the
Account must be invested as the money in other state accounts is
invested. After deducting all applicable charges, all interest and
income earned on the money in the Account must be credited to the
Account. Any money remaining in the Account at the end of a fiscal
year does not revert to the State General Fund, and the balance in
the Account must be carried forward to the next fiscal year.
3. For each fiscal year, the Board of Regents shall estimate:
(a) The amount of money in the Trust Account that is available
to make payments pursuant to subsection 1 for that fiscal year; and
(b) The anticipated amount of such payments for that fiscal year.
 If the anticipated amount of payments estimated for the fiscal
year exceeds the estimated amount of money available in the
Account in the fiscal year for such payments, the Board of Regents
may request an allocation from the Contingency Account created in
the State General Fund pursuant to NRS 353.266 to cover the
projected shortfall.
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Firefighter” means a person who is a salaried employee or
volunteer member of a:
(1) Fire prevention or suppression unit organized by a local
government and whose principal duty is to control and extinguish
fires; or
(2) Fire-fighting agency.
(b) “Fire-fighting agency” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 450B.072.
(c) “Local government” means a county, city, unincorporated
town or metropolitan police department.
(d) “Member of a rescue or emergency medical services crew”
means:
(1) A member of a search and rescue organization in this
State under the direct supervision of any county sheriff;
(2) A person licensed as an attendant pursuant to chapter
450B of NRS if the person is a salaried employee of a public agency
and is not retained under contract to perform services for the public
agency;
(3) A person certified as an emergency medical technician,
advanced emergency medical technician or paramedic pursuant to
chapter 450B of NRS if the person is a salaried employee or
volunteer of a public agency and is not retained under contract to
perform services for the public agency; or
-
*SB237_R1*

– 7 –
(4) A volunteer attendant as that term is defined in
NRS 450B.110.
(e) “Peace officer” means a category I peace officer, category II
peace officer or category III peace officer as those terms are defined
in NRS 289.460, 289.470 and 289.480, respectively.
(f) “Public agency” means an agency, bureau, commission,
department or division of the State of Nevada or a political
subdivision of the State of Nevada that provides police, firefighting,
rescue or emergency medical services.
(g) “Public employee” means any person who performs public
duties for compensation paid by or through the State, a county, city,
local government or other political subdivision of the State or an
agency thereof.
(h) “Public employee who was killed in the performance of his
or her duties” includes, without limitation, a public employee who
dies as a result of injuries sustained in the performance of his or her
duties.
(i) “Public safety officer” means a person serving a public
agency in an official capacity, with or without compensation, as a
peace officer, a firefighter or a member of a rescue or emergency
medical services crew.
(j) “Public safety officer who was killed in the line of duty”
includes, without limitation, a public safety officer who dies as a
result of injuries sustained [in] :
(1) In the line of duty [.] ; or
(2) While traveling to or from his or her place of
employment if, pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement,
such time is considered a part of the shift of the public safety
officer.
H
-
*SB237_R1*